Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.173

Electronic transmissions—Acceptance and filing by the secretary of state.

(1) The secretary of state may accept and file in the secretary's office electronic transmissions of any documents authorized or required to be filed pursuant to Title 23, 23B, 24, or 25 RCW or chapter 18.100 RCW. The acceptance by the secretary of state is conditional upon the document being legible and otherwise satisfying the requirements of state law or rules with respect to form and content, including those established under RCW 43.07.170. If the document must be signed, that requirement may be satisfied by an electronic signature.

(2) If a fee is required for filing the document, the secretary may reject the document for filing if the fee is not received before, or at the time of, receipt.

[ 2019 c 132 s 4; 2016 c 202 s 61; 1998 c 38 s 1.]